District of Columbia statutes.
24-401.02

Abolished

Powers and duties of Board; transfer of employees, official records, etc. from Board of Parole.

Abolished.

Apr. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-103, § 3, 34 DCR 8279
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 745, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11231(b)
1981 Ed., § 24-201.2.